Florida, session 2026, SB176.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âSection 1004.0983, Florida Statutes, is created 18 to read: 19 1004.0983âPublic postsecondary safety policies and 20 procedures.â 21 (1)âEach state university and Florida College System 22 institution shall adopt and implement written policies and 23 procedures to protect the physical safety of its students, 24 faculty, staff, and visitors in campus facilities, classrooms, 25 and other institutional settings from: 26 (a)âPhysical threats. 27 (b)âOther conduct or language that would cause a reasonable 28 person to believe his or her physical safety is at risk. 29 (2)âThe policies and procedures must: 30 (a)âIdentify a person responsible for: 31 1.âCoordinating the state university or Florida College 32 System institutionâs response to actions listed in paragraphs 33 (1)(a) and (b). 34 2.âImplementing such policies and procedures, including all 35 safety measures. 36 (b)âEstablish clear internal and external reporting 37 protocols, including notification of campus security or a local 38 law enforcement agency when appropriate. 39 (c)âOutline the protective measures available to affected 40 persons, which may include work or class relocation, security 41 escorts, and restricting access to certain areas by a person 42 engaged in an activity listed in paragraph (1)(a) or paragraph 43 (1)(b). 44 (d)âProvide timely updates to an affected person regarding 45 the status of an incident and any action taken. 46 (e)âEnsure the policies and procedures are prominently 47 posted on the state universityâs or Florida College System 48 institutionâs website and available to students, faculty, staff, 49 and visitors upon request. 50 (3)âEach state university and Florida College System 51 institution shall annually review and update the policies and 52 procedures to incorporate the best practices in threat 53 assessment, campus security, and safety. 54 (4)âThe Board of Governors may adopt regulations and the 55 State Board of Education may adopt rules to administer this 56 section. 57 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.